Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.140

Form of letters of administration.

Letters of administration shall be signed by the clerk, and be under the seal of the court, and may be substantially in the following form:

State of Washington, County of . . . . . .

Whereas, A.B., late of . . . . . . on or about the . . . . day of . . . . . . A.D. (year) . . . . died intestate, leaving at the time of his or her death, property in this state subject to administration: Now, therefore, know all persons by these presents, that we do hereby appoint . . . . . . . . . administrator upon said estate, and whereas said administrator has duly qualified, hereby authorize him or her to administer the same according to law.

Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . . day of . . . . . . A.D. (year) . . . .

[ 2016 c 202 s 7; 2009 c 549 s 1005; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.140. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 65; RRS s 1435; prior: Code 1881 s 1392; 1863 p 220 s 125; 1860 p 182 s 92.]